Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1735
Creating self-sufficiency contract
and meeting work activity requirement; applicant under twenty years of age;
activities authorized.

For purposes of creating the self-sufficiency contract and
meeting the applicant's work activity requirement, an applicant who is under
twenty years of age and is married or a single head of household is deemed
to have met the work activity requirement in a month if he or she:

(1) Maintains
satisfactory attendance during such month at secondary school, a general education
development program, or the equivalent; or

(2) Participates in education directly related
to employment for an average of at least twenty hours per week during such
month. Education directly related to employment includes, but is not limited
to, Adult Basic Education, English as a Second Language, and a general education
development program.

Laws 2012, LB507, § 2.